Wisconsin, session 2025, AB597.
do enact as follows:AB597,13Section 1. 45.49 of the statutes is created to read:AB597,2,5145.49 State matching grants for recipients of federal per diem 2payments. (1) Definition. In this section, “eligible entity” means an eligible 3entity under 38 USC 2011 (d) other than the state that, on the date of application 4under this section, has been awarded per diem payments under 38 USC 2012 (a) for 5the upcoming fiscal year.AB597,2,96(2) Matching per diem payments. (a) The department may award state 7matching grants to eligible entities, in the order in which the applications are 8received, for services that qualify for federal per diem payments under 38 USC 92012.AB597,2,1210(b) The department shall take applications for grants under this section on an 11annual basis, and may approve grants of $25 per day per veteran that the eligible 12entity is capable of housing, for up to 365 days per year.AB597,2,1513(c) The department shall pay grants awarded to eligible entities under par. (b) 14on a quarterly basis in an amount that equals $25 per day per veteran housed by the 15eligible entity in the previous quarter.AB597,2,1616